Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-603
State Treasurer; seal authentication; copies evidence of original.

The State Treasurer shall keep a seal of office for the authentication of all papers, writings and documents required by law to be certified by him, and copies so authenticated and certified, of all papers and documents lawfully deposited in his office, shall be received in evidence the same as the original papers and documents.

R.S.1866, c. 4, § 22, p. 26;

R.S.1913, § 5578;

C.S.1922, § 4882;

C.S.1929, § 84-603;

R.S.1943, § 84-603.